Hawaii statutes.
§286-106.5 Expiration of licenses;
out-of-country active duty military personnel and dependents.
Notwithstanding section 286-106, the expired driver's license of a member of
any component of the United States armed forces who is on active federal service,
or the member's dependent if the dependent accompanied the member, and whose
driver's license expired while the member was deployed outside the United
States, shall remain valid for ninety days after the service member's return to
the United States. [L 2008, c 50, §1; am L 2012, c 22, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next